Utah statutes.
10-6-146.   City treasurer -- Deposit of city funds -- Commingling with
personal funds unlawful -- Suspension from office.
The treasurer shall promptly deposit all city funds in the appropriate bank
accounts of the city. It shall be unlawful for any person to commingle city
funds with his or her own money. Whenever it shall appear that the treasurer
or any other officer is making profit out of public money, or is using the
same for any purpose not authorized by law, such treasurer or officer shall be
suspended from office.
